Wyoming, session 2026, HB0027.
Be It Enacted by the Legislature of the State of Wyoming:

Section 1. W.S. 15-1-404 by creating a new subsection
(c) is amended to read:

HB0027

2026 STATE OF WYOMING 26LSO-0214
15-1-404. Annexing territories; initiation of
proceedings; by governing bodies; determination.

(c) Jurisdiction over a building permit or land use
application pending at the time that the subject land or
building was annexed by a governing body of a city or town
under this section shall remain with the county with whom
the application was initially filed. The county's
jurisdiction shall continue until the county issues or
denies the final building permit or land use application,
at which time jurisdiction shall transfer to the annexing
city or town. No county shall arbitrarily or capriciously
deny a pending building permit or land use application
under this subsection for the sole purpose of transferring
jurisdiction to the annexing city or town.

Section 2. This act shall apply to annexations,
building permit applications and land use applications
filed on and after July 1, 2026.

Section 3. This act is effective July 1, 2026.

(END)
HB0027